Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-1531.01
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Environmental Protection Act shall be construed to apply to any wells or holes covered by sections 57-901 to 57-922.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 17.